Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-956
Cold storage plants; construction and operation; power.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have the power to purchase, construct, maintain and improve cold storage or refrigeration plants for the use of their respective municipalities and the inhabitants thereof.

Laws 1941, c. 24, § 1, p. 118;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-801;

R.S.1943, § 17-956.